California statutes. Corporations Code
 Proposed to be SoldFiling Fee$25,000 or less$ 25$25,001 to $100,000$ 35$100,001 to $500,000$ 50$500,001 to $1,000,000$150Over $1,000,000$300(d) The fee for filing an application for designation of an issuer pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 25100 is fifty dollars ($50).

(e) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by notification under Section 25112 or by permit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 (except applications for qualification by permit of the sale of any guarantee of any security, the fees for which applications are fixed in subdivision (k)) is two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold in this state up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The fee for filing a small company application for qualification of the
 sale of securities by permit under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). In the case where the costs of processing a small company application exceed the filing fee, an additional fee shall be charged, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), over and above the filing fee based on the costs of the salary or other compensation paid to persons processing the application plus overhead costs reasonably incurred in the performance of the work. In determining the costs, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons processing applications for the fiscal year.

(f) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by coordination under Section 25111 or a notice of intention to sell under subdivision (t) of Section 25100 is two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold
 in this state up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(g) For the purpose of determining the fees fixed in subdivisions (e) and (f):

(1) The value of the securities shall be the price at which the company proposes to sell the securities, or the value, as alleged in the application, or the actual value, as determined by the commissioner, of the consideration (if other than money) to be received in exchange therefor, or of the securities when sold, whichever is greater.

(2) Interim or voting trust certificates shall have a value equal to the aggregate value of the securities to be represented by the interim or voting trust certificates.

(3) The value of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of
 the same or another issuer shall be an amount equal to the consideration to be paid for that warrant or right plus an amount equal to the consideration to be paid upon purchase of the additional securities, provided that if the latter amount is not determinable at the time of qualification, that amount shall then be the value of the additional securities as determined by the commissioner.

(4) In the case of a share dividend where the shareholders are given an option to accept either cash or additional shares of common stock, the value of the securities to be sold shall be the maximum amount of cash that would be payable in the event that all shareholders elected to accept cash.

(h) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by permit under Section 25121 is:

(1) Two hundred dollars
 ($200) in connection with any change (including any stock split or reverse stock split or stock dividend, except a stock dividend where the shareholders are given an option to accept either cash or additional shares of common stock) in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities.

(2) Two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the value, as alleged in the application, or the actual value, as determined by the commissioner, of the consideration to be received in exchange therefor, up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), in any exchange of securities by the issuer with its existing security holders exclusively, or in any exchange in connection with any merger or consolidation or purchase of corporate assets in consideration of the issuance of securities, or any entity conversion transaction.

(i) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by notification under Section 25131 shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(j) The fee for an application for the removal of any condition under Section 25141 is fifty dollars ($50).

(k) The fee for filing any application for a permit to execute or issue any guarantee of any security is fifty dollars ($50).

(l) The fee for acting as escrowholder for securities under Section 25149 is fifty dollars ($50). In addition, a fee of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be paid for the deposit with the commissioner of each new certificate or other document resulting from a transfer in escrow.

(m) The fee for filing an application for an order (1) consenting
 to the transfer in escrow of securities or (2) consenting to the transfer of securities subject to any condition imposed by the commissioner requiring the commissioner’s consent to the transfer is twenty dollars ($20) for each transfer.

(n) The filing fee for an amendment to an application filed after the effective date of the qualification of the sale of securities is fifty dollars ($50) plus any additional fee that would have been required to be paid with the original application for qualification of the sale of securities under this section if the matters set forth in the amendment had been included in the original application.

(o) (1) The fee for filing an application for a broker-dealer certificate under Section 25211 is three hundred dollars ($300).

(2) Each broker-dealer shall pay to the
 commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses, reasonably incurred in the administration of the broker-dealer program under this division, as estimated by the commissioner for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the program in the year in which the assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion that the broker-dealer and the number of its agents in this state bears to the aggregate number of broker-dealers and agents in this state as shown by records maintained by or on behalf of the commissioner. The pro rata share may include the costs of any examinations, audit, or investigation provided for in subdivision (r).

(3) Every broker-dealer who has secured from the commissioner a certificate shall, in order to keep the certificate in effect for an additional period, pay a minimum assessment of seventy-five dollars ($75) on or before the 31st of December in each
 year.

(4) The commissioner may assess and levy against each broker-dealer any additional amount above the minimum assessment amount of seventy-five dollars ($75) that is reasonable and necessary to support the broker-dealer program under this division. If an additional amount is assessed, the commissioner shall notify each broker-dealer by mail of any additional amount assessed and levied against it on or before the 30th day of May in each year, and that amount shall be paid within 20 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty in addition to the assessment of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(5) If a broker-dealer fails to pay any assessment on or before the 30th day of the month following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by
 order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the broker-dealer. If, after that order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a broker-dealer shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner; provided, however, that the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided under this division.

(6) In determining the amount assessed, the commissioner shall consider all appropriations from the Financial Protection Fund for the support of the broker-dealer program under this division and all reimbursements applicable to the administration of the broker-dealer program under this division.

(p) (1) The commissioner shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50) for the filing of a notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25210 or subdivision (b) of Section 25230.

(2) The commissioner shall charge a fee up to fifty dollars ($50) to keep in effect for the following year any notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25210 or subdivision (b) of Section 25230.

(3) No person shall, on behalf of a broker-dealer licensed pursuant to Section 25211, effect any transaction in, or induce or attempt to induce the purchase or sale of, any security in this state unless the broker-dealer pays the annual fee required by paragraph (2) of this subdivision on or before the day upon which payment is due.

(4) No person may, in this state, on behalf of an investment adviser licensed pursuant to Section 25231, offer or negotiate for the sale of investment advisory services of the investment adviser, determine which
 recommendations shall be made to, make recommendations to, or manage the accounts of, clients of the investment adviser, or determine the reports or analyses concerning securities to be published by the investment adviser, unless the investment adviser pays the annual fee required by paragraph (2) on or before the day upon which payment is due.

(5) The commissioner may by order summarily enjoin an individual from performing any activity under paragraph (3) or (4) if the annual fee in paragraph (2) is not paid on or before the day upon which payment is due. An order under this paragraph may not be made before 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the fee is due and unpaid.

(q) (1) Except as provided for in paragraph (2), the fee for filing an application for an investment adviser under Section 25231 is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), and
 payment of this amount shall keep the certificate, if granted, in effect during the calendar year during which it is granted. Every investment adviser who has secured from the commissioner a certificate shall, in order to keep the certificate in effect for an additional period, pay a renewal fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) on or before the 31st day of December.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a broker-dealer licensed under Section 25210.

(r) (1) Except as provided for in paragraph (2), the fee for any routine or nonroutine regulatory examination, audit, or investigation is the amount of the salary or other compensation paid to the persons making the examination, audit, or investigation plus the amount of expenses including overhead reasonably incurred in the performance of the work. In determining the costs associated with an examination,
 audit, or investigation, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations, audits, or investigations for the fiscal year.

(2) An investment adviser licensed under Section 25230 pursuant to the Investment Adviser Registration Depository shall not be subject to paragraph (1) only in regard to the fee for a routine regulatory examination of its investment advisory services for which it is licensed under Section 25230.

(s) The fee for any hearing held by the commissioner pursuant to Section 25142 shall be the sum determined by the commissioner to cover the actual expense of noticing and holding the hearing.

(t) The commissioner may fix by rule a reasonable charge for any publications issued under the commissioner’s authority. The charges shall not apply to reports of the commissioner in the ordinary course of distribution.

(u) The fee for filing an offer under subdivision (b) of Section 25507 shall be the amount of filing fee payable under subdivision (e), (f), (h), or (i) of this section if an application had been filed to qualify the transaction in which the securities upon which the offer is to be made were sold in violation of the qualification provisions of this law.

(v) The fee for filing an application for exemption pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 25100 is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(w) The commissioner may by
 rule require payment of a fee for filing a notice or report required by a rule adopted pursuant to Section 25105. The fee required in connection with a transaction as defined by that rule shall not exceed the fees specified in subdivision (c) based on the value of the securities sold, but the commissioner may permit a single notice for more than one transaction.

(x) The fee for filing the first notice of transaction under subdivision (n) of Section 25102 is six hundred dollars ($600).

(y) The fee for filing a notice of transaction under subdivision (o) of Section 25102 shall be the fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by permit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 as set forth in subdivision (e) of this section.

(z) The fee for filing a notice of transaction
 under subdivision (h) of Section 25103 shall be six hundred dollars ($600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 5.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.1.

(a) The fee for an investment company filing a notice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25100.1 is two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold in this state up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b) The fee for an issuer filing a notice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25102.1 is six hundred dollars ($600).

(c) The fee for an issuer filing a notice pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 25102.1 is three hundred dollars ($300).

(d) 
 (1) The fee for an investment adviser filing a notice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25230.1 is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and the fee for filing a notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25230.1 is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) The commissioner may charge a fee up to thirty-five dollars ($35) to keep in effect for the following year any notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25210 or subdivision (b) of Section 25230.

(3) The commissioner may by order summarily enjoin an individual from performing any activity under subdivision (c) of Section 25230.1 if the annual fee required by paragraph (2) is not paid on or before the day upon which payment is due. An order under this paragraph may not be made before 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the
 fee is due and unpaid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 335, Sec. 10.   (SB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.2.

Commencing July 1, 2000, the fee provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 25608, as they apply to the fee for filing a notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 25102, and the fee provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 25608.1, shall be the maximum fees that may be levied on a notice filing under subdivision (b) of Section 25100.1, subdivision (f) of Section 25102, and subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) of Section 25102.1. The commissioner, however, may set the notice filing fee under subdivision (c) of Section 25608, as it
 relates to a notice filing under subdivision (f) of Section 25102, and the notice filing fees under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 25608.1, at amounts below the maximum fees set forth in those sections. The commissioner shall set the notice filing fees under those sections for the upcoming fiscal year on or about June 1 of each year. If the commissioner fails to set the notice filing fees for the upcoming fiscal year, then the filing fees shall be the maximum fees that may be levied under those sections for the upcoming fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 264, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 25608 and 25608.1, the commissioner may set any fee under those sections at an amount below the maximum fee set forth in those sections. The commissioner shall set the fee for the upcoming fiscal year on or about June 1 of each year, except that for the six-month period of January 1, 2002, through June 30, 2002, and for the 2002–03 fiscal year, the commissioner, on January 1, 2002, shall, in a reasonable and prudent manner, reduce any fee under Sections 25608 and 25608.1 by an amount below the maximum fee set forth
 in those sections. For the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2003, and thereafter, the commissioner shall establish the level of fees adequate to cover anticipated costs, including the maintenance of a prudent reserve, but not to exceed the maximum fees that may be levied under Sections 25608 and 25608.1. If, for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2003, or thereafter, the commissioner fails to set the fee for the upcoming fiscal year on or before June 1, then the fee for the next fiscal year shall be the fee that was in effect for the current fiscal year.

(b) In carrying out this section, the commissioner shall reduce or suspend fees to achieve no more than a 25-percent fund balance in the State Corporations Fund by June 30, 2007, and thereafter.

(c) The department shall report by February 1, 2002, to the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairs of the
 budget committees on the fees to be reduced and the projected revenue and fund balance impact on the State Corporations Fund through the 2006–07 fiscal year. Each year from 2002 through 2007, the department shall submit a status update report by November 1 on the fees reduced, the revenue and fund balance impact in the prior fiscal year, and the projected revenue and fund balance impact through the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25609.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25610.

The commissioner may from time to time make, amend and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this law, including rules and forms governing applications and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this law, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this law. For the purpose of rules and forms, the commissioner may classify securities, persons, and matters within his jurisdiction, and may prescribe different requirements for different classes. The commissioner may in his discretion waive any requirement of any rule or form in situations where in his opinion such requirement is not
 necessary in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25611.

The commissioner may prepare and make available to interested persons lists of persons whose securities are qualified for trading purposes in this state, are exempt from qualification, or are not subject to qualification as the commissioner may determine to be necessary or desirable, and the commissioner may make reasonable charges for those lists to defray the expenses of preparation and dissemination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 48, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.

No rule, form or order may be made, amended, or rescinded unless the commissioner finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors and consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.3.

Unless otherwise provided by rule, the commissioner shall require the use of the following forms:

(a) Form BD (Uniform Application for Broker-Dealer Registration) for a broker-dealer application.

(b) Form ADV (Uniform Application for Investment Adviser Registration) for an investment adviser application.

(c) Form BDW (Uniform Request for Broker-Dealer Withdrawal) for withdrawing from licensure as a broker-dealer.

(d) Form ADV-W (Notice of Withdrawal from Registration as an Investment Adviser) for withdrawing from licensure as an investment adviser.

(e) Form U4 (Uniform Application for Securities Industry Registration or Transfer) for the reporting of an agent of a broker-dealer or an investment adviser representative or associated person of an investment adviser.

(f) Form U5 (Uniform Termination Notice for Securities Industry Registration) for the reporting of the termination of an agent of a broker-dealer or an investment adviser representative or associated person of an investment adviser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 51.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25612.5.

(a) To encourage uniform interpretation and administration of this law and the Franchise Investment Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000)) and effective securities and franchise regulation and enforcement, the commissioner may cooperate with the securities agencies or administrators of one or more states, Canadian provinces or territories, or other countries, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the Securities Investor Protection Corporation, any self-regulatory organization, any national or international organization or securities officials or agencies, and any governmental law enforcement or regulatory agency.

(b) The cooperation authorized by subdivision (a) includes, but is not limited to, the following
 actions:

(1) Prescribing rules and forms with a view to achieving maximum uniformity in the form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports wherever practicable.

(2) Participating in a nationwide central depository for qualification or registration of securities under this law and for documents or records required or allowed to be maintained under this law.

(3) Participating in the Central Registration Depository, or any successor or alternative nationwide or regional depository, for the registering, certifying, or licensing of broker-dealers or agents, or both.

(4) Participating in the Investment Adviser Registration Depository, or any successor or alternative nationwide or regional depository, for the registering, certifying, or
 licensing of investment advisers or investment adviser representatives, or both.

(5) Cooperating in any regulatory activity necessary in the administration of the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56; USA Patriot Act), consistent with state law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any application for qualification, amendment to the application or related securities qualification or registration document or notice under Sections 25100.1, 25101.1, 25102, 25102.1, 25110, 25120, 25130, and 25230.1 or record otherwise required to be signed that is filed in this state as an electronic record pursuant to a nationwide central depository for qualification or registration of securities, or any electronic record filed through the Central Registration Depository or the
 Investment Adviser Registration Depository, shall be deemed to be a valid original document upon reproduction to paper form by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(d) For purposes of this section, “electronic record” has the same meaning as in subdivision (g) of Section 1633.2 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 82.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25613.

The commissioner may by rule or order prescribe (1) the form and content of financial statements required under this law, (2) the circumstances under which consolidated financial statements shall be filed, and (3) the circumstances under which financial statements shall be audited by independent certified public accountants or public accountants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25614.

All rules of the commissioner (other than those relating solely to the internal administration of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation) shall be made, amended, or rescinded in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Rules may be adopted prior to the effective date of this law to become effective upon its effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 83.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25615.

A document is filed when it is received by the commissioner; but no qualification of the sale of securities shall become effective until the appropriate fee has been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25616.

The commissioner shall keep an index of all qualifications which are or have ever been effective, all denial, suspension, or revocation orders which have been entered and all permits and certificates which have been issued by him under this law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25617.

Upon request and at such reasonable charges as he prescribes by rule, the commissioner shall furnish to any person photostatic or other copies (certified under his seal of office if requested) of any document which is retained as a matter of public record, except that he shall not charge or collect any fee for photostatic or other copies of any document furnished to public officers for use in their official capacity. In any judicial proceeding or prosecution, any copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the document certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25618.

The commissioner in his discretion may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25619.

(a) The commissioner may destroy any applications, notices, orders, permits, and revoked or surrendered certificates, together with the files and folders, as useless or obsolete, four years after the date of filing or issuance, with the approval of the Department of General Services; provided, that a permanent record shall be maintained of any disciplinary action taken by the commissioner.

(b) When acting as escrow holder for securities, the commissioner may destroy any
 certificates evidencing securities of any corporation which has been dissolved or whose charter has been suspended for a period of not less than two years for nonpayment of taxes or penalties and may destroy any other records pertaining to the escrow of the securities destroyed, and he or she shall have no further liability or accountability therefor; provided, that the commissioner shall maintain a permanent record containing such information as he or she may by rule prescribe relating to the certificates and records so destroyed.

(c) Copies on microfilm or in other form which may be retained by the commissioner in his discretion of any records destroyed under this section shall be accepted for all purposes as equivalent to the original when certified by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section does not require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic record” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any qualification,
 registration, order, permit, certificate, license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) An order, permit, certificate, license, consent, or other authority.

(D) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, qualification, registration, order, permit, certificate, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(F) The transcripts of a hearing.

(G) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(H) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, including broker-dealer and investment adviser applications, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 84.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 8. GENERAL PROVISIONS [25700. - 25707.]

25700.

No provision of this law imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion of the commissioner, or any such opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that the rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25701.

Any condition, stipulation or provision purporting to bind any person acquiring any security to waive compliance with any provision of this law or any rule or order hereunder is void.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25702.

Whenever a person is entitled under this law to a hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a formal hearing before the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation may be substituted with the consent of such person and of the commissioner for such hearing before an independent hearing officer; and in that case after such hearing before the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation such person shall not be entitled to any further administrative remedy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 85.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25703.

If any provision of this law or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this law which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this law are declared to be severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25704.

(a) Except as expressly provided in this section, prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this law.

(b) No civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability or to establish that any securities are void under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and, in any event, within three years after the effective date of this law.

(c) All effective permits, certificates, orders, consents, and registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to the same and all conditions imposed upon the same remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this law had not been enacted. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this law, but are governed by prior law. Certificates dated as of January 1, 1969, may be issued by the commissioner after the effective date of this law pursuant to applications filed prior thereto and shall be considered to have been issued under the prior law. Applications for permits filed prior to January 1, 1969, may subsequently be processed without amendment if they comply with prior law, but thereafter shall be otherwise governed by this law.

(d) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this law are governed by Section 25609, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25705.

All references to “the Corporate Securities Law” in any code or statute of the State of California shall hereafter be deemed to be references to the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25706.

(a) All effective permits, orders, and consents under the Real Estate Syndicate Act, all administrative orders relating to the Real Estate Syndicate Act, and all conditions imposed upon the Real Estate Syndicate Act remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if such act had not been repealed, but shall be considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this law. An application to amend, extend, modify, revoke, or set aside any such permits, orders, or consents shall be filed under and be subject to the provisions of this division.

(b) Any application pending under the Real Estate Syndicate Act, upon the effective date of this section, shall be processed by the Real Estate Commissioner pursuant to the provisions of the Real Estate Syndicate Act in effect on December 31, 1977, until such application is granted or denied by such commissioner.

(c) Except as expressly provided by this section, the Real Estate Syndicate Act continues to govern all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending prior to, or which may be initiated thereunder on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring prior to, the effective date of this section.

(d) No civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under the Real Estate Syndicate Act, unless brought within any period of limitation which applied the time the cause of action accrued.

(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders under the Real Estate Syndicate Act as to which review proceedings have not been commenced prior to the effective date of this section shall be governed by Section 25609, except that no review proceeding may be commenced unless the petition is filed within the applicable period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was issued and except that judicial review of administrative orders of the Real Estate Commissioner made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be governed by the provisions of law applicable to such proceedings on December 31, 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

25707.

(a) All permits and orders issued under Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, and all conditions imposed pursuant to those provisions, shall remain in effect for the period of time that they would have remained in effect if those provisions had not been repealed by the act enacting this section. Following the repeal of those provisions, the permits, orders, and conditions shall be deemed to have been issued or imposed under this division. An application to amend, extend, modify, revoke, or set aside a permit or order shall be filed under this division and is subject to this division.

(b) An application pending under Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, on the effective date of this section, shall be processed by the Real Estate Commissioner subject to those provisions as they were in effect on December 31, 1996, until each application that was pending on the effective date of this section is granted or denied by the Real Estate Commissioner.

(c) Except as expressly provided by this section, all actions, prosecutions, or proceedings under Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code that are pending prior to the effective date of this section, or that otherwise could be initiated based on facts or circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of this section, shall be governed by those provisions.

(d) No civil action may be brought to enforce any liability under Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, unless it is brought within the period of limitations that applied to the action at the time the action accrued.

(e) Judicial review of orders under Article 6 (commencing with Section 10237) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code that had not commenced prior to the effective date of this section shall be governed by Section 25609, except that no review proceeding shall be commenced unless the petition is filed within the applicable period of limitations that applied to a review proceeding when the order was issued. Judicial review of an order of the Real Estate Commissioner made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be governed by the provisions of law applicable to those proceedings on December 31, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 2. SECURITY OWNERS PROTECTION [27000. - 27202.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [27000. - 27003.]

27000.
